Washington statutes.
RCW 12.40.010

Department authorized—Jurisdictional amount.

(1) In every district court there shall be created and organized by the court a department to be known as the "small claims department of the district court." The small claims department shall have jurisdiction, but not exclusive, in cases for the recovery of money only if the amount claimed does not exceed:

(a) Ten thousand dollars in cases brought by a natural person; or

(b) Five thousand dollars in all other cases.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "natural person" means a human being.

[ 2019 c 86 s 1; 2008 c 227 s 2; 2001 c 154 s 1; 1991 c 71 s 1; 1988 c 85 s 1; 1984 c 258 s 57; 1981 c 331 s 10; 1979 c 102 s 4; 1973 c 128 s 1; 1970 ex.s. c 83 s 1; 1963 c 123 s 1; 1919 c 187 s 1; RRS s 1777-1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Subheadings not law—2008 c 227: See notes following RCW 3.50.003.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Court Congestion Reduction Act of 1981—Purpose—Severability—1981 c 331: See notes following RCW 2.32.070.

Application, savings—Effective date—Severability—1979 c 102: See notes following RCW 3.66.020.